test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-3lex_haaitis_nongradable_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjective - kiärgus: # 2A d -kk, rg > r'g A_VEESKIR
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Nom: kiärgus
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Gen: kiärgus
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Acc: kiärgus
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Ill: kiärgusân
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Loc: kiärgusist
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Com: kiärgusáin
    kiärgus+A+Sg+Abe: kiärgusttáá
    kiärgus+A+Ess: kiärgusin
    kiärgus+A+Par: kiärgusid
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Nom: kiärguseh
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Gen: kiärgusij
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Acc: kiärgusijd
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Ill: kiärgusáid
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Loc: kiärgusijn
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Com: [kiärgusijguin, kiärgusijgijn]
    kiärgus+A+Pl+Abe: kiärgusijttáá
